New York, session 2025-2026, A996.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The education law is amended by adding a new section 2104 2 to read as follows: 3 § 2104. Voting by trustees and members of board of education. No trus- 4 tee or member of a board of education shall vote on any matter before 5 the board when such vote shall affect a person who is related to the 6 trustee or member and such person is employed by the board of education 7 or school district or would be financially impacted by such vote. 8 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00374-01-5